Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 4
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS

27-50-401. Regional behavioral health administrative services organizations - establishment.

No later than July 1, 2024, the commissioner shall select and contract with regionally based behavioral health organizations to establish, administer, and maintain adequate networks of behavioral health safety net services and care coordination, as described in part 3 of this article 50.

The commissioner shall designate regions of the state for behavioral health administrative services organizations to operate. In establishing regions, the commissioner shall consult with the department of health care policy and financing to ensure consideration of the regional structure that serves the medicaid population.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1464, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-402. Behavioral health administrative services organizations - application - designation - denial - revocation.

At least once every five years, the commissioner shall solicit applications through a competitive bid process pursuant to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, for entities to apply to be a behavioral health administrative services organization. Any qualified public or private corporation; for-profit or not-for-profit organization; or public or private agency, organization, or institution may apply in the form and manner determined by the BHA's rules. The BHA is authorized to award contracts to more than one applicant. The BHA shall use competitive bidding procedures to encourage competition and improve the quality of services.

The commissioner shall select a behavioral health administrative services organization based on factors established by BHA rules and the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24. The factors for selection must include, but are not limited to, the following:

The applicant's experience working with publicly funded clients, including expertise in treating priority populations determined by the BHA;

The applicant's experience working with and engaging relevant stakeholders in the service area, including behavioral health providers; state and local agencies; and the local community, including advocacy organizations and clients of behavioral health services;

The extent to which real or perceived conflicts of interest between the applicant and behavioral health facilities or behavioral health providers are mitigated; and

The extent to which the applicant's board complies with conflict of interest policies, including to the following:

The board shall not have more than fifty percent of contracted providers as board members;

Providers who have ownership or board membership in a behavioral health administrative services organization shall not have control or decision-making authority in the establishment of provider networks; and

An employee of a contracted provider of a behavioral health administrative services organization shall not also be an employee of the behavioral health administrative services organization unless the employee is the clinical officer or utilization management director of the behavioral health administrative services organization. If the individual is also an employee of a provider that has board membership or ownership in the behavioral health administrative services organization, the behavioral health services organization shall develop policies approved by the commissioner to mitigate any conflict of interest the employee may have.

The extent to which the applicant's board membership reflects the diversity and interests of relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representation by individuals with lived behavioral health experience and family of individuals with lived behavioral health experience.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1465, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-403. Behavioral health administrative services organizations - contract requirements - individual access - care coordination.

The BHA shall develop a contract for designated behavioral health administrative services organizations, which must include, but is not limited to, the following:

Requirements to establish and maintain a continuum of care and network adequacy in the service area consistent with part 3 of this article 50, including but not limited to providing all behavioral health safety net services described in section 27-50-301;

Expectations for subcontracting with behavioral health safety net providers and other providers, consistent with part 3 of this article 50, including prioritization of comprehensive community behavioral health providers;

Expectations for adherence to the universal contracting provisions developed pursuant to section 27-50-203 and use of the universal contracting provisions with all relevant subcontractors;

Reporting requirements related to claiming federal funding for eligible services and programs;

Prohibitions on denying or prohibiting access to any medically necessary behavioral health service, including medication-assisted treatment, as defined in section 23-21-803, for a substance use disorder;

Requirements to serve all individuals in need of services and a specific prohibition on denial of services for any of the reasons provided in section 27-50-301 (4);

Agreements on data collection and reporting, including any provisions necessary to implement section 27-50-201;

Procedures related to corrective actions pursuant to section 27-50-402;

Any provisions necessary to ensure the behavioral health administrative services organization fulfills the functions provided in subsection (2) of this section; and

Requirements for calculating and reporting the annual administrative costs. The BHA shall establish and enforce the maximum allowable administrative cost ratios for the behavioral health administrative services organizations and report the actual performance of each behavioral health administrative services organization annually.

A behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

Proactively engage hard-to-serve individuals with adequate case management and care coordination throughout the care continuum;

Implement trauma-informed care practices;

Accept and provide behavioral health safety net services to individuals outside of the behavioral health administrative services organization's region;

Promote competency in de-escalation techniques;

Through network adequacy and other methods, ensure timely access to treatment, including high-intensity behavioral health treatment and community-based treatment for all individuals including children, youth, and adults;

Require collaboration with all local law enforcement and county agencies in the service area, including county departments of human or social services;

Triage individuals who need alternative services outside the scope of the behavioral health safety net system;

Promote patient-centered care, cultural awareness, and coordination of care to appropriate behavioral health safety net providers;

Collaborate with schools and school districts in the service area to identify gaps in services and to promote student access to behavioral health services at school and in the contracting with providers to build the network of behavioral health safety net services, inclusion of relevant programs or services eligible for federal grants or reimbursement, including relevant programs or services identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse;

Update information as requested by the BHA about available treatment options and outcomes in each region of the state;

Utilize evidence-based or evidence-informed programming to promote quality services;

Consider, when contracting with providers to build the network of behavioral health safety net services, inclusion of relevant programs or services eligible for federal grants or reimbursement, including relevant programs or services identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse; and

Meet any other criteria established by the BHA.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1466, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-404. Care coordination - responsibilities of behavioral health administrative services organizations - coordination with managed care entities.

Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care entities have the shared responsibility of providing care coordination services in a manner consistent with article 60 of this title 27 for individuals utilizing the behavioral health safety net system.

Managed care entities are responsible for providing care coordination services, as required by section 25.5-5-419, to individuals enrolled in the state medical assistance program.

Behavioral health administrative services organizations are responsible for providing care coordination services, whether directly or through contract with behavioral health safety net providers, to individuals who are not currently enrolled in the state medical assistance program, with access for priority populations as required by part 3 of this article 50.

The BHA shall establish objective and standardized processes for care coordination, including:

Coordination between behavioral health administrative services organizations and other care coordination entities, including managed care entities, case management agencies, counties, and other behavioral health administrative services organizations, to ensure continuity of care across shared populations consistent with subsection (1) of this section;

Referral processes between entities, including a behavioral health administrative services organization's responsibility to provide care coordination to an individual pending commencement of care coordination services by another entity; and

Processes to ensure efficient and person-centered care coordination services for individuals who have acute and complex needs, including individuals involved in the civil involuntary treatment system pursuant to articles 65 and 81 of this title 27; individuals transitioning out of treatment settings or acute care settings; and individuals involved in the child welfare, juvenile justice, or criminal justice systems.

A behavioral health administrative services organization shall ensure care coordination services through its network and include local partners, when appropriate, such as counties and school districts.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1468, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-405. Behavioral health administrative services organizations - stakeholder input - report - rules.

Each behavioral health administrative services organization shall develop a process to solicit and respond to input from stakeholders about behavioral health services and gaps in the service area. A behavioral health administrative services organization shall publicly post an annual report that includes:

A report on the stakeholder input received in the prior year, anonymized and aggregated to protect individual privacy;

Descriptions of how the behavioral health administrative services organization has responded to, or plans to respond to, stakeholder input from the prior year, including descriptions of policy or practice changes or explanations of why no changes were made; and

The plan for stakeholder engagement for the upcoming year.

In soliciting and responding to input from stakeholders pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall, at a minimum, engage the following stakeholders within the service area:

Clients of behavioral health services and their families;

Behavioral health safety net providers;

Counties;

Law enforcement;

Hospitals and physical health providers; and

Judicial districts.

The behavioral health administrative services organization may also engage stakeholders in neighboring service areas, as appropriate.

The BHA may promulgate rules as necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1469, § 1, effective July 1.